dev/saldo/saldo.verbs.dix
    <pardef n="kn/ipa__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>ipas</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipa</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipits</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipit</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ip</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipet</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipets</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipen</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipens</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipna</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipnas</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipne</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipnes</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipna</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipnas</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipna</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipnas</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eps</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ep</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipes</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipe</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipande</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipandes</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipes</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ips</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iper</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipes</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ipe</l><r>ipa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mäl/a__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>d</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ds</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>da</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>das</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>de</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>des</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>da</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>das</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>da</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>das</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>des</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tes</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>de</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>te</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ande</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>andes</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>es</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="genmäla"><i>genmäl</i><par n="mäl/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beknipa"><i>bekn</i><par n="kn/ipa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="föregripa"><i>föregr</i><par n="kn/ipa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gripa"><i>gr</i><par n="kn/ipa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="omförmäla"><i>omförmäl</i><par n="mäl/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mäla"><i>mäl</i><par n="mäl/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="angripa"><i>angr</i><par n="kn/ipa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tillgripa"><i>tillgr</i><par n="kn/ipa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förmäla"><i>förmäl</i><par n="mäl/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inbegripa"><i>inbegr</i><par n="kn/ipa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="knipa"><i>kn</i><par n="kn/ipa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="begripa"><i>begr</i><par n="kn/ipa__vblex"/></e>
